ksw-syllables.ksw.unrestricted.lexd
PATTERNS
Consonant Medial Vowel Tone
Consonant Medial Aa

LEXICON Consonant
ပ
ဖ
သ
တ
ထ
က
ခ
အ
ဘ
ဒ
စ
ဆ
ဃ
ဟ
ဇ
ဂ
ဧ
မ
န
ည
င
ဝ
ယ
လ
ရ

LEXICON Medial
<w>:ွ
<l>:ျ
<r>:ြ
<y>:ၠ
<g>:ှ
:

LEXICON Vowel
<i>:ံ
<ei>:့
<ai>:ဲ
<u>:ု
<e>:ၢ
<oo>:ူ
<o>:ိ
<au>:ီ
:

LEXICON Tone
<j>:ၢ်
<z>:ၤ
<f>:ၣ်
<x>:ာ်
<v>:း
:

LEXICON Aa
<aa>:ါ
